Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Chapter 9. Employer’s Liability and Workers’ Compensation
§ 641.
Vocational rehabilitation.

When as a result of an injury covered by this chapter, an employee is unable to perform work for which the employee has previous training or experience, the employee shall be entitled to vocational rehabilitation services, including retraining and job placement, as may be reasonably necessary to restore the employee to suitable employment. Vocational rehabilitation services shall be provided as follows:

The employer shall designate a vocational rehabilitation provider from a list provided by the Commissioner to initially provide services. Thereafter, absent good cause, the employee may have only one opportunity to select another vocational rehabilitation provider from a list provided by the Commissioner upon giving the employer written notice of the employee’s reasons for dissatisfaction with the designated provider and the name and address of the provider selected by the employee.

The Department shall provide an injured worker with a form that includes information and employee rights. The form shall clearly and simply explain the worker’s rights, including the choice of provider, the right to challenge a determination, and reimbursement for related expenses. The worker shall sign the form and return it to the Department.

The Commissioner shall adopt rules to ensure that a worker who requests services or who has been out of work for more than 90 days is timely and cost-effectively screened for benefits under this section. The rules shall:

Provide that all vocational rehabilitation work, except for initial screenings, be performed by a Vermont-certified vocational rehabilitation counselor, including counselors currently certified pursuant to the rules of the Department. Initial screenings shall be performed by an individual with sufficient knowledge or experience to perform adequately the vocational rehabilitation screening functions.

Provide for an initial screening to determine whether a full assessment is appropriate. An injured worker who is determined to be eligible for a full assessment shall be timely assessed and offered appropriate vocational rehabilitation services.

Provide a mechanism for a periodic and timely screening of injured workers who are initially found not to be ready or eligible for a full assessment to determine whether a full assessment has become appropriate.

Protect against potential conflicts of interest in the assignment and performance of initial screenings.

Ensure the injured worker has a choice of a vocational rehabilitation counselor.

If services are not voluntarily offered and accepted by the employee, the Commissioner, if necessary through informal hearing, may refer the employee to a qualified physician or appropriate facility for evaluation of the practicability of, need for, and kind of service, treatment, or training necessary and appropriate to render the employee fit for a remunerative occupation. Upon receipt of findings and after affording the parties an opportunity to be heard, the Commissioner may order that the services and treatment recommended, or such other rehabilitation treatment or service the Commissioner may deem necessary be provided at the expense of the employer. When vocational rehabilitation requires residence at or near a facility or institution, away from the employee’s customary residence, the reasonable cost of board, lodging, or travel, or both, shall be paid for by the employer. In addition, the employer shall pay reasonable costs of books, tools, or other basic materials required in such rehabilitation process. Refusal to accept vocational rehabilitation pursuant to an order of the Commissioner may result in loss of compensation for each week of the refusal, if the Commissioner so directs.

The Commissioner may set by rule reasonable reimbursement rates for vocational rehabilitation benefits and services, provided access to vocational rehabilitation services is not diminished, and reasonable choices and access to benefits and services are maintained. The fee schedule shall require the individual vocational rehabilitation counselor who provides services to review, initial, and certify the accuracy of the billing.

[Repealed.]

Any person offering to provide vocational rehabilitation services to workers’ compensation recipients shall register with the Department and shall possess appropriate qualification as established by the Department by rule. The Commissioner may determine that a vocational rehabilitation service provider lacks the appropriate qualifications if the provider fails to comply with the educational and training requirements established by the Commissioner and may revoke the provider’s registration.

Any vocational rehabilitation plan for a claimant presented to the employer shall be deemed valid if the employer was provided an opportunity to participate in the development of the plan and has made no objections or changes within 21 days after submission. A vocational rehabilitation counselor shall provide the employer with a written invitation to participate in plan development, including the date, time, and place to provide an opportunity to participate in the development of the plan, with a copy to the Department. The participation in the development of the plan may be conducted by telephone. The written notice shall be evidence of the opportunity to participate in plan development and shall be appended to the proposed plan.

The Commissioner may adopt rules necessary to carry out the purpose of this section.

In support of the State’s fundamental interest in ensuring the well-being of employees and employers, it is the intent of the General Assembly that, following a workplace accident, an employee return to work as soon as possible but remain cognizant of the limitations imposed by his or her medical condition.
(e) (1) In support of the State’s fundamental interest in ensuring the well-being of employees and employers, it is the intent of the General Assembly that, following a workplace accident, an employee return to work as soon as possible but remain cognizant of the limitations imposed by his or her medical condition.

The Commissioner shall adopt rules promoting development and implementation of cost-effective, early return-to-work programs.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 64

, § 2;

1975, No. 177

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1981, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1993, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1997, No. 140

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1999, No. 97

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2003, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. May 26, 2004;

2005, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 29, 2006;

2007, No. 208

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2009, No. 33

, § 43;

2011, No. 50

, § 2;

2011, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2013, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 53, eff. June 24, 2014.

§ 642.
Temporary total disability benefits.

Where the injury causes total disability for work, during such disability, but not including the first three days, the day of the accident to be counted as the first day, unless the employee received full wages for that day, the employer shall pay the injured employee a weekly compensation equal to two-thirds of the employee’s average weekly wages, but not more than the maximum nor less than the minimum weekly compensation. In addition, the injured employee, during the disability period shall receive $10.00 a week for each dependent child who is unmarried and under the age of 21 years, provided that no other injured worker is receiving the same benefits on behalf of the dependent child or children. However, in no event shall an employee’s total weekly wage replacement benefits, including any payments for a dependent child, exceed 90 percent of the employee’s average weekly wage prior to applying any applicable cost of living adjustment. The amount allowed for dependent children shall be increased or decreased weekly to reflect the number of dependent children extant during the week of payment. If the total disability continues after the third day for a period of seven consecutive calendar days or more, compensation shall be paid for the whole period of the total disability.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 191

, § 2;

1963, No. 191

, § 3;

1965, No. 67

, § 2;

1965, No. 73

;

1967, No. 122

, § 6;

1971, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1973, No. 64

, § 3;

1977, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. May 3, 1978;

1981, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1993, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2003, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 26, 2004.

§ 642a.
Temporary total; insurer review.

The employer shall review every claim for temporary total disability benefits that continues for more than 104 weeks. No later than 30 days after 104 weeks of continuous temporary total disability benefits have been paid, the employer shall file with the Department and the claimant a medical report from a physician that evaluates the medical status of the claimant, the expected duration of the disability, and when or if the claimant is expected to return to work. If the evaluating physician concludes that the claimant has reached a medical end result, the employer shall file a notice to discontinue.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 208

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 643.
Period of payments.

Payments shall not continue after such disability ends.

HISTORY:

Amended

1977, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. May 3, 1978.

§ 643a. Section 643a repealed effective July 1, 2023; see also section 643a effective July 1, 2023 below. Discontinuance of benefits.

Unless an injured worker has successfully returned to work, an employer shall notify both the Commissioner and the employee prior to terminating benefits under either section 642 or 646 of this title. The notice of intention to discontinue payments shall be filed on forms prescribed by the Commissioner and shall include the date of the proposed discontinuance, the reasons for it, and, if the employee has been out of work for 90 days, a verification that the employer offered vocational rehabilitation screening and services as required under this chapter. All relevant evidence, including evidence that does not support discontinuance in the possession of the employer not already filed, shall be filed with the notice. The liability for the payments shall continue for seven days after the notice is received by the Commissioner and the employee. If the claimant disputes the discontinuance, the claimant may file with the Commissioner an objection to the discontinuance and seek an extension of 14 days. The objection to the discontinuance shall be specific as to the reasons and include supporting evidence. A copy of the objection shall be provided to the employer at the time the request is made to the Commissioner. Those payments shall be made without prejudice to the employer and may be deducted from any amounts due pursuant to section 648 of this title if the Commissioner determines that the discontinuance is warranted or if otherwise ordered by the Commissioner. Every notice shall be reviewed by the Commissioner to determine the sufficiency of the basis for the proposed discontinuance. If, after review of all the evidence in the file, the Commissioner finds that a preponderance of all the evidence in the file does not reasonably support the proposed discontinuance, the Commissioner shall order that payments continue until a hearing is held and a decision is rendered. Prior to a formal hearing, an injured worker may request reinstatement of benefits by providing additional new evidence to the Department that establishes that a preponderance of all evidence now supports the claim. If the Commissioner’s decision, after a hearing, is that the employee was not entitled to any or all benefits paid between the discontinuance and the final decision, upon request of the employer, the Commissioner may order that the employee repay all benefits to which the employee was not entitled. The employer may enforce a repayment order in any court of law having jurisdiction.

HISTORY:

Added 2013 No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 54b, eff. July 1, 2023 per

2017, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 643a. Section 643a effective July 1, 2023; see also section 643a effective until July 1, 2023 set out above. Discontinuance of benefits.

Unless an injured worker has successfully returned to work, an employer shall notify both the Commissioner and the employee prior to terminating benefits under either section 642 or 646 of this title. The notice of intention to discontinue payments shall be filed on forms prescribed by the Commissioner and shall include the date of the proposed discontinuance, the reasons for it, and, if the employee has been out of work for 90 days, a verification that the employer offered vocational rehabilitation screening and services as required under this chapter. All relevant evidence, including evidence that does not support discontinuance in the possession of the employer not already filed, shall be filed with the notice. The liability for the payments shall continue for seven days after the notice is received by the Commissioner and the employee. Those payments shall be made without prejudice to the employer and may be deducted from any amounts due pursuant to section 648 of this title if the Commissioner determines that the discontinuance is warranted or if otherwise ordered by the Commissioner. Every notice shall be reviewed by the Commissioner to determine the sufficiency of the basis for the proposed discontinuance. If, after review of all the evidence in the file, the Commissioner finds that a preponderance of all the evidence in the file does not reasonably support the proposed discontinuance, the Commissioner shall order that payments continue until a hearing is held and a decision is rendered. Prior to a formal hearing, an injured worker may request reinstatement of benefits by providing additional new evidence to the Department that establishes that a preponderance of all evidence now supports the claim. If the Commissioner’s decision, after a hearing, is that the employee was not entitled to any or all benefits paid between the discontinuance and the final decision, upon request of the employer, the Commissioner may order that the employee repay all benefits to which the employee was not entitled. The employer may enforce a repayment order in any court of law having jurisdiction.

HISTORY:

Added 2013 No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 54b, eff. July 1, 2023 per

2017, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 643b.
Reinstatement; seniority and benefits protected.

For purposes of this section:

“Employer” shall be defined as provided in section 601 of this title provided that this section shall only apply to employers who regularly employ at least 10 employees of whom at least 10 work more than 15 hours per week.

“Recovery” means that the worker can reasonably be expected to perform safely the duties of his or her prior position or an alternative suitable position.

The employer of a worker disabled by an injury compensable under this chapter shall reinstate the worker when his or her inability to work ceases provided recovery occurs within two years of the onset of the disability. A worker who recovers within two years of the onset of the disability shall be reinstated in the first available position suitable for the worker given the position the worker held at the time of the injury.

Upon reinstatement a worker shall regain seniority and any unused annual leave, personal leave, sick leave, and compensatory time he or she was entitled to prior to the interruption in employment, less any leave and compensatory time used during the period of interruption.

The provisions of this section shall not apply if:

the worker had been given notice, or had given notice, prior to sustaining the injury that employment would terminate;

employment would have terminated of its own terms prior to any reinstatement the worker would otherwise be entitled to under this section;

the worker fails to keep the employer informed of:

his or her continuing interest in reinstatement;

his or her recovery;

any change of his or her mailing address.

A worker aggrieved by an employer’s failure to comply with the provisions of this section may bring an action in the Superior Court in the county in which the worker or the employer resides for damages, including punitive damages, for noncompliance and may apply for such equitable relief as may be just and proper under the circumstances. A copy of the complaint shall be filed with the Commissioner. The Court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees to the plaintiff if he or she prevails.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 105

, § 1.

§ 643c.
Commissioner to provide notice; monitoring.

The Commissioner shall notify the employer and worker of the provisions of section 643b of this title as soon as a claim is filed if, in the Commissioner’s opinion, it appears that they will be affected by the requirement for reinstatement.
The Commissioner shall also request that such workers and employers supply, on a voluntary basis, information concerning requests for reinstatement, reinstatement of disabled workers, and the extent to which recourse is being sought under that section.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 105

, § 2.

§ 644.
Permanent total disability.

In case of the following injuries, the disability caused thereby shall be deemed total and permanent:

the total and permanent loss of sight in both eyes;

the loss of both feet at or above the ankle;

the loss of both hands at or above the wrist;

the loss of one hand and one foot;

an injury to the spine resulting in permanent and complete paralysis of both legs or both arms or of one leg and of one arm; and

an injury to the skull resulting in severe traumatic brain injury causing permanent and severe cognitive, physical, or psychiatric disabilities.

The enumeration in subsection (a) of this section is not exclusive, and, in order to determine disability under this section, the Commissioner shall consider other specific characteristics of the claimant, including the claimant’s age, experience, training, education, and mental capacity.

HISTORY:

Amended

1977, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. May 3, 1978;

1999, No. 97

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 137.

§ 645.
Amount payable.

In case of an injury enumerated in section 644 of this title, the employer shall pay to the injured employee 662/3 percent of the employee’s average weekly wages, computed as provided in section 650 of this title and subject to the maximum and minimum weekly compensation rates, for the duration of the employee’s permanent total disability, but in no event shall the employee receive benefits for less than 330 weeks. Benefits under this section shall continue beyond 330 weeks if the injury results in the loss of actual earnings or earning capacity after the injured employee is as far restored as the permanent character of the injuries will permit and results in the employee having no reasonable prospect of finding regular employment.

The amount of compensation payable under this section shall not include the payment of compensation under sections 640, 642, and 646. However, the payment of compensation under this section shall not occur until after the termination of compensation under sections 642 or 646 or both.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 191

, § 3;

1963, No. 191

, § 4;

1965, No. 67

, § 3;

1967, No. 122

, § 7;

1977, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. May 3, 1978;

1981, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 646.
Temporary partial disability benefits.

Where the disability for work resulting from an injury is partial, during the disability and beginning on the eighth day thereof, the employer shall pay the injured employee a weekly compensation equal to two-thirds of the difference between his or her average weekly wage before the injury and the average weekly wage which he or she is able to earn thereafter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 191

, § 5;

1965, No. 67

, § 4;

1967, No. 122

, § 8;

1981, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

1991, No. 264

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

Partial incapacity.

Partial incapacity for work is where injured workman is able both to procure and to perform work at some occupation suitable to his then existing capacity, but less remunerative than the work in which he was engaged when injured. Roller v. Warren, 98 Vt. 514, 129 A. 168, 1925 Vt. LEXIS 159 (1925).

§ 647.
Period of payment.

Payments shall not continue after such temporary partial disability ends.

HISTORY:

Amended

1977, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. May 3, 1978.

§ 648.
Permanent partial disability benefits.

Where the injury results in a partial impairment which is permanent and which does not result in permanent total disability, compensation shall be paid during the period of total disability, as provided in sections 642 and 643 of this title, and at the termination of total disability, the employer shall pay to the injured employee 662/3 percent of the average weekly wage, computed as provided in section 650 of this title, subject to the maximum and minimum weekly compensation rates, for a period determined by multiplying the employee’s percentage of impairment of the whole person by 330 weeks. The percentage of impairment to the whole person is the percentage of impairment to the particular body part, system, or function converted to the percentage of impairment to the whole person as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

Any determination of the existence and degree of permanent partial impairment shall be made only in accordance with the whole person determinations as set out in the Fifth Edition of the American Medical Association Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment. In order to utilize any subsequent edition of the American Medical Association Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment or any other appropriate guides to the evaluation of permanent impairment, the Commissioner, in consultation with the Department of Labor Advisory Council, shall adopt a rule. The Commissioner shall adopt a supplementary schedule for injuries that are not rated by the impairment guide authorized for use by the Department to determine permanent disability.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section, for the purposes of determining the payment period for any permanent partial impairment to the spine, the percentage of impairment shall be determined in accordance with rules adopted by the Commissioner according to which an injury to the spine which is evaluated as a 60 percent impairment of the whole person shall provide 330 weeks of compensation.

An impairment rating determined pursuant to this section shall be reduced by any previously determined permanent impairment for which compensation has been paid, but if the combination of the prior impairment rating and the rating determined pursuant to this section would result in the employee being considered permanently totally disabled, the prior rating shall not negate a finding of permanent total disability.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 34

, eff. March 12, 1959;

1963, No. 134

, § 2, eff. June 6, 1963;

1977, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. May 3, 1978;

1993, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. April 1, 1995;

2007, No. 208

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 649.
Injuries not covered; burden of proof.

Compensation shall not be allowed for an injury caused by an employee’s willful intention to injure himself, herself, or another or by or during his or her intoxication or by an employee’s failure to use a safety appliance provided for his or her use.
The burden of proof shall be upon the employer if he or she claims the benefit of the provisions of this section.

Particular cases.

In a case where a workers’ compensation claimant accidentally drank a caustic agent that was in a soda bottle he had taken home from work, his injury arose out of his employment when he accepted the bottle containing the caustic chemicals, and his alleged intoxication at the time he drank from the bottle did not bar his claim. His act of accepting the bottle at work put the mechanism of injury in motion, and no one suggested he was intoxicated at that time. Cyr v. McDermott's, Inc., 2010 VT 19, 187 Vt. 392, 996 A.2d 709, 2010 Vt. LEXIS 18 (2010).

§ 650.
Payment; average wage; computation.

Average weekly wages shall be computed in such manner as is best calculated to give the average weekly earnings of the worker during the 26 weeks preceding an injury; but where, by reason of the shortness of the time during which the worker has been in the employment, or the casual nature of the employment, or the terms of the employment, it is impracticable to compute the rate of remuneration, average weekly wages of the injured worker may be based on the average weekly earnings during the 26 weeks previous to the injury earned by a person in the same grade employed at the same or similar work by the employer of the injured worker, or if there is no comparable employee, by a person in the same grade employed in the same class of employment and in the same district. If during the period of 26 weeks an injured employee has been absent from employment on account of sickness or suspension of work by the employer, then only the time during which the employee was able to work shall be used to determine the employee’s average weekly wage. If the injured employee is employed in the concurrent service of more than one insured employer or self-insurer the total earnings from the several insured employers and self-insurers shall be combined in determining the employee’s average weekly wages, but insurance liability shall be exclusively upon the employer in whose employ the injury occurred. The average weekly wage of a volunteer firefighter, volunteer rescue or ambulance worker, volunteer reserve police officer, or volunteer as set forth in 3 V.S.A. § 1101(b)(4), who is injured in the discharge of duties as a firefighter, rescue or ambulance worker, police officer, or State agency volunteer, shall be the employee’s average weekly wage in the employee’s regular employment or vocation but the provisions of section 642 of this title relative to maximum weekly compensation and weekly net income rates, shall apply. For the purpose of calculating permanent total or permanent partial disability compensation, the provisions relating to the maximum and minimum weekly compensation rate shall apply. In any event, if a worker at the time of the injury is regularly employed at a higher wage rate or in a higher grade of work than formerly during the 26 weeks preceding the injury and with larger regular wages, only the larger wages shall be taken into consideration in computing the worker’s average weekly wages.

In determining the compensation to be paid to any member of the National Guard or the Vermont State Guard, if that member is not regularly employed by some other person, it shall be assumed that the member is receiving income from a business or from other employment equivalent to wages in an amount one and one-half times the maximum compensation rate for total disability. If the wages received for the performance of duties as a member of the National Guard or Vermont State Guard exceed the wages received from a regular employer, that member shall be entitled to a rate of compensation based on wages received as a member of the National Guard or Vermont State Guard.

When temporary disability, either total or partial, does not occur in a continuous period but occurs in separate intervals each resulting from the original injury, compensation shall be adjusted for each recurrence of disability to reflect any increases in wages or benefits prevailing at that time. For the purpose of computation, the adjustments shall be based upon the compensation received by a person in the same grade employed in the same class of employment and in the same district. The provisions of this section shall apply to compensable accidents occurring on and after July 1, 1973.

Compensation computed pursuant to this section shall be adjusted annually on July 1, so that such compensation continues to bear the same percentage relationship to the average weekly wage in the State as computed under this chapter as it did at the time of injury. Temporary total or temporary partial compensation shall first be adjusted on the first July 1 following the receipt of 26 weeks of benefits.

If weekly compensation benefits or weekly accrued benefits are not paid within 21 days after becoming due and payable pursuant to an order of the Commissioner, or in cases in which the overdue benefit is not in dispute, 10 percent of the overdue amount shall be added and paid to the employee, in addition to interest and any other penalties. In the case of an initial claim, benefits are due and payable upon entering into an agreement pursuant to subsection 662(a) of this title, upon issuance of an order of the Commissioner pursuant to subsection 662(b) of this title, or if the employer has not denied the claim within 21 days after the claim is filed. Benefits are in dispute if the claimant has been provided actual written notice of the dispute within 21 days of the benefit being due and payable and the evidence reasonably supports the denial. Interest shall accrue and be paid on benefits that are found to be compensable during the period of nonpayment. The Commissioner shall promptly review requests for payment under this section and, consistent with subsection 678(d) of this title, shall allow for the recovery of reasonable attorney’s fees associated with an employee’s successful request for payment under this subsection.

When benefits have been awarded or are not in dispute as provided in subsection (e) of this section, the employer shall establish a weekday on which payment shall be mailed or deposited and notify the claimant and the Department of that day. The employer shall ensure that each weekly payment is mailed or deposited on or before the day established. Payment shall be made by direct deposit to a claimant who elects that payment method. The employer shall notify the claimant of his or her right to payment by direct deposit. If the benefit payment is not mailed or deposited on the day established, the employer shall pay to the claimant a late fee of $10.00 or five percent of the benefit amount, whichever is greater, for each weekly payment that is made after the established day. As used in this subsection, “paid” means the payment is mailed to the claimant’s mailing address or, in the case of direct deposit, transferred into the designated account. In the event of a dispute, proof of payment shall be established by affidavit.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 29

, § 2, eff. March 11, 1959;

1965, No. 173

;

1969, No. 261

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. April 7, 1970;

1973, No. 30

, §§ 1, 2;

1981, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1983, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. March 28, 1984;

1993, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2003, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. May 26, 2004;

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 33;

2005, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. May 29, 2006;

2007, No. 208

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

2009, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2019, No. 85

(Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. Jan. 1, 2021.

§ 651.
Voluntary payments.

Payments made by an employer or his or her insurer to an injured worker during the period of his or her disability, or to his or her dependents, which, by the provisions of this chapter, were not due and payable when made, may, subject to the approval of the Commissioner, be deducted from the amount to be paid as compensation.

HISTORY:

Amended

1977, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. May 3, 1978;

1981, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 652.
Periodical payments; lump sum payments.

Upon application of either party, the Commissioner may authorize compensation to be paid monthly or quarterly instead of weekly, having regard to the welfare of the employee and the convenience of the employer.

Upon application of the employee, if the Commissioner finds it to be in the best interest of the employee or the employee’s dependents, the Commissioner may order the payment of permanent disability benefits pursuant to section 644 or 648 of this title to be paid in a lump sum.

Unless otherwise requested by the claimant, an order for a lump sum payment of permanent partial or permanent total disability benefits or a lump sum settlement of a disputed claim shall include a provision accounting for excludable expenses and prorating the remainder of the lump sum payment in the manner set forth by the Social Security Administration in order to protect the claimant’s entitlement to Social Security benefits.

HISTORY:

Amended

1999, No. 97

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2005, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. May 29, 2006.

§ 653.
Repealed.
1977, No. 182 (Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. May 3, 1978.

§ 654.
Trustee in case of lump payments; appointment; expense.

Whenever, for any reason, the Commissioner deems it expedient, any lump sum which is to be paid as provided in section 653 of this title shall be paid by the employer to some bank, banking institution, or trust company to be appointed by the Commissioner as trustee to administer or apply the same for the benefit of the persons entitled thereto in the manner provided by the Commissioner.
The payment of such money by the employer, evidenced by the receipt of the trustee, shall operate as a satisfaction of the compensation.
In the appointment of such trustee preference shall be given, in the discretion of the Commissioner, to the choice of the employee or the dependents of the deceased employee.
The expense of the administration of such trust shall be fixed by the Commissioner and shall be a charge upon the compensation so deposited.

§ 655.
Procedure in obtaining compensation; medical examination; video and audio recording.

After an injury and during the period of disability, if so requested by his or her employer, or ordered by the Commissioner, the employee shall submit to examination, at reasonable times and within a two-hour driving radius of the residence of the injured employee, by a duly licensed physician or surgeon designated and paid by the employer. The Commissioner may in his or her discretion permit an examination outside the two-hour driving radius if it is necessary to obtain the services of a provider who specializes in the evaluation and treatment specific to the nature and extent of the employee’s injury. The employee may make a video or audio recording of any examination performed by the insurer’s physician or surgeon or have a licensed health care provider designated and paid by the employee present at the examination. The employer may make an audio recording of the examination. The right of the employee to record the examination shall not be construed to deny to the employer’s physician the right to visit the injured employee at all reasonable times and under all reasonable conditions during total disability. If an employee refuses to submit to or in any way obstructs the examination, the employee’s right to prosecute any proceeding under the provisions of this chapter shall be suspended until the refusal or obstruction ceases, and compensation shall not be payable for the period which the refusal or obstruction continues.

HISTORY:

Amended

2009, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 16;

2013, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 62, eff. June 24, 2014.

§ 655a.
Release of relevant medical records by health care providers; Department to oversee release and use of relevant medical information.

Health care providers examining or attending the examination of an injured worker pursuant to this chapter shall provide relevant medical records and reports as requested by the injured worker, the employer, or the Department regarding the diagnosis, condition, or treatment of the worker, permanent impairment, or any restrictions or limitations on the worker’s ability to work upon receiving a written medical release authorization from the injured worker. The authorization shall be on a form approved by the Department. If the relevance of any medical information is disputed, the Department shall determine whether the requested medical information is relevant.

Medical information relevant to the specific claim includes a past history of complaints or treatment of a condition similar to that presented in the claim or other conditions related to the same body part. Information that may be requested includes:

Minimum data to justify services and payment, including that on the standard paper 1500 form or electronic 837 form.

Office notes of the examination relating to the injury diagnosis or treatment.

Any other relevant provider records contained in the file.

An injured worker shall only be obligated to sign a medical record release authorization approved by the Department.

Any medical information received by the employer or the insurance carrier that is found not to be relevant to the claim may not be used to deny or limit a claim. The Commissioner may order that specific disclosure requests be denied or rescinded and may make such other interim orders as are appropriate.

Any medical information received in conjunction with a claim shall be used only for the purpose of advancing or defending a claim relating to the injury or of investigating a claim of false representation or of ensuring compliance with the workers’ compensation statutes and rules.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 50

, § 4.

§ 656.
Notice of injury and claim for compensation.

A proceeding under the provisions of this chapter for compensation shall not be maintained unless a notice of the injury has been given to the employer as soon as practicable after the injury occurred, and unless a claim for compensation with respect to an injury has been made within six months after the date of the injury; or, in case of death, within six months after death, unless the claimant had made a claim for compensation prior to death.

The date of injury, or in the case of occupational disease, the date of injurious exposure shall be the point in time when the injury or disease, and its relationship to the employment is reasonably discoverable and apparent. If that date occurs after the employee has ceased all employment, the employee shall be entitled to reasonable and necessary medical treatment necessitated by the injury and permanent partial or permanent total disability compensation based on the employee’s average weekly wage at the time of the last work-related exposure.

The notice and claim may be given or made by any person claiming to be entitled to compensation or by someone in the employee’s behalf. If payments of compensation have been made voluntarily, the making of a claim within this period shall not be required. If the claim is denied after voluntary payments were made, the claimant shall commence proceedings under this chapter within six months from the date of denial.

HISTORY:

Amended

1993, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

1999, No. 41

, § 5.

§ 657.
After court judgment against employee.

In case, through mistake of law or fact, a suit has been brought to recover damages in any court and final judgment is against the employee, the limitation in section 656 of this title shall not begin to run until six months after such suit has been finally determined.

§ 658.
Form of notice and claim.

The notice and claim required under the provisions of section 656 of this title shall be in writing.
Such notice shall contain the name and address of the employee, shall state in ordinary language the time, place, nature, and cause of the injury and shall be signed by the employee or by a person in his or her behalf, or, in the event of his or her death, by any one or more of his or her dependents or by a person in their behalf.
The notice and the claim may be combined.